dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY eiarsntolucéÉmpdgbhfvqjyxèÈzkçÇîÎïÏwûÛôÔàÀáÁëËüÜöÖóÓòÒíÍìÌùÙúÚäÄ

PFX M Y 1
PFX M   0      m'      [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh]

PFX T Y 1
PFX T   0      t'      [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh]

PFX L Y 1
PFX L   0      l'      [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh]

PFX S Y 1
PFX S   0      s'      [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh]

PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q   0     qu'      [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh]

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0     n'       [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh]

PFX l N 1
PFX l   0     l'       [aeéèiouUàáóòíìúùh]

PFX D Y 1
PFX D   0     d'       [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh]

SFX A Y 41
SFX A   r     0         ar
SFX A   r     n         ar
SFX A   r     va        ar
SFX A   r     van       ar
SFX A   ar    èt        ar
SFX A   ar    èron      ar
SFX A   0     à         ar
SFX A   0     àn        ar
SFX A   ar    e         ar
SFX A   ar    en        ar
SFX A   ar    èsse      ar
SFX A   ar    èsson     ar
SFX A   0     iá        ar
SFX A   0     ián       ar
SFX A   ir    ís        ir
SFX A   ir    isson     ir
SFX A   ir    issiá     ir
SFX A   ir    issiá     ir
SFX A   ir    iguèt     ir
SFX A   ir    iguèron   ir
SFX A   ir    irà       ir
SFX A   ir    iràn      ir
SFX A   ir    iriá      ir
SFX A   ir    irián     ir
SFX A   ir    isca      ir
SFX A   ir    iscan     ir
SFX A   ir    iguèsse   ir
SFX A   ir    iguèsson  ir
SFX A   re    0         re
SFX A   re    on        re
SFX A   re    iá        re
SFX A   re    ián       re
SFX A   re    èt        re
SFX A   e     à         re
SFX A   e      àn       re
SFX A   re     a        re
SFX A   re     an       re
SFX A   re     èsse     re
SFX A   re     èsson    re
SFX A   re     riá      re
SFX A   re     rián     re

SFX F Y 58
SFX F   0      a        [nbclrdmn]
SFX F   0      as       [nbclrdmn]
SFX F   0      a        [^u][t]
SFX F   0      as       [^u][t]
SFX F   0      a        ant
SFX F   0      as       ant
SFX F   0      a        ent
SFX F   0      as       ent
SFX F   0      sa       òs
SFX F   0      sas      òs
SFX F   ós     osa      ós
SFX F   ós     osas     ós
SFX F   0      a        òt
SFX F   0      as       òt
SFX F   it     ida      it
SFX F   it     idas     it
SFX F   0      a        i
SFX F   0      as       i
SFX F   e      a        e
SFX F   e      as       e
SFX F   0      sa       [e]s
SFX F   0      sas      [e]s
SFX F   ís     issa     ís
SFX F   ís     issas    ís
SFX F   tge    tja      tge
SFX F   tge    tjas     tge
SFX F   ag     aja      ag
SFX F   ag     ajas     ag
SFX F   és     esa      és
SFX F   és     esas     és
SFX F   at     ada      at
SFX F   at     adas     at
SFX F   ut     uda      [u]t
SFX F   ut     udas     [u]t
SFX F   as     assa     as
SFX F   as     assas    as
SFX F   às     assa     às
SFX F   às     assas    às
SFX F   iu     iva      iu
SFX F   iu     ivas     iu
SFX F   ívol   ivola    ívol
SFX F   ívol   ivolas   ívol
SFX F   e      a        aire
SFX F   e      as       aire
SFX F   0      a        enc
SFX F   0      as       enc
SFX F   dor    doira    ador
SFX F   dor    doiras   ador
SFX F   aire   aira     aire
SFX F   aire   airas    aire
SFX F   0      a        ièch
SFX F   0      as       ièch
SFX F   c      ga       uc
SFX F   c      gas      uc
SFX F   ge     ja       ge
SFX F   ge     jas      ge
SFX F   u      va       au
SFX F   u      vas      au

SFX s Y 22
SFX s   0      s        [íáaeiournmlrdfp]
SFX s   0      s        [^s][t]
SFX s   0      es      st
SFX s   0      s        [^s][c]
SFX s   sc     sques    [s]c
SFX s   0      s        lh
SFX s   ós     oses     [ó]s
SFX s   0      ses      [ò]s
SFX s   0      es       ch
SFX s   ç      ces      ç
SFX s   0      es       g
SFX s   tz     ses      tz
SFX s   és     eses     és
SFX s   0      èses     ès
SFX s   ís     ises     ís
SFX s   ívol   ivoles   ívol
SFX s   0      enses    ens
SFX s   c      ques     enc
SFX s   às     asses    às
SFX s   0      ses      èis
SFX s   0      ses      [^úòóàé]s
SFX s   ús     usses    [ú]s

SFX a Y 40
SFX a   ar     i        [^uaoie]ar
SFX a   ar     as       ar
SFX a   ar     a        ar
SFX a   ar     am       ar
SFX a   ar     atz      ar
SFX a   ar     an       ar
SFX a   ar     es       ar
SFX a   ar     e        ar
SFX a   ar     em       ar
SFX a   ar     etz      ar
SFX a   ar     en       ar
SFX a   ar     èsses    ar
SFX a   ar     èsse     ar
SFX a   ar     èssem    ar
SFX a   ar     èssetz   ar
SFX a   ar     èsson    ar
SFX a   ar     avi      ar
SFX a   ar     avas     ar
SFX a   ar     ava      ar
SFX a   ar     àvem     ar
SFX a   ar     àvetz    ar
SFX a   ar     avan     ar
SFX a   ar     èri      ar
SFX a   ar     ères     ar
SFX a   ar     èt       ar
SFX a   ar     èrem     ar
SFX a   ar     èretz    ar
SFX a   ar     èron     ar
SFX a   0      ai       ar
SFX a   0      às       ar
SFX a   0      à        ar
SFX a   0      em       ar
SFX a   0      etz      ar
SFX a   0      àn       ar
SFX a   0      iái      ar
SFX a   0      iás      ar
SFX a   0      iá       ar
SFX a   0      iam      ar
SFX a   0      iatz     ar
SFX a   0      ián      ar

SFX b Y 22
SFX b   ar     am       ar
SFX b   ar     atz       ar
SFX b   ar     em       ar
SFX b   ar     etz       ar
SFX b   ar     avi        ar
SFX b   ar     avas       ar
SFX b   ar     ava        ar
SFX b   ar     àvem     ar
SFX b   ar     àvetz     ar
SFX b   ar     avan      ar
SFX b   0      ai          ar
SFX b   0      às          ar
SFX b   0      à           ar
SFX b   0      em        ar
SFX b   0      etz        ar
SFX b   0      àn         ar
SFX b   0      iái         ar
SFX b   0      iás        ar
SFX b   0      iá          ar
SFX b   0      iam       ar
SFX b   0      iatz       ar
SFX b   0      ián        ar

SFX c Y 15
SFX c  i        as          i
SFX c  i        a            i
SFX c  i        an          i
SFX c  i        es          i
SFX c  i        e            i
SFX c  i        en          i
SFX c  ui      as          [g][u]i
SFX c  ui      a          [g][u]i
SFX c  ui      an          [g][u]i
SFX c  ï        as           ï
SFX c  ï        a            ï
SFX c  ï        an          ï
SFX c  ï        es          ï
SFX c  ï        e            ï
SFX c  ï       en          ï

SFX d Y 10
SFX d    èri       ères         èri
SFX d    èri       èt            èri
SFX d    èri       èrem        èri
SFX d    èri       èretz        èri
SFX d    èri       èron         èri
SFX d    èri       èsse         èri
SFX d    èri       èsses        èri
SFX d    èri       èssem       èri
SFX d    èri       èssetz      èri
SFX d    èri       èsson       èri
