dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.dic
aboniment/slD
abordatge/slD
abordicar/MTLQg
abosquir/MTLQNi
acantelir/MTLQNi
acantonar/MTLQNa
acarnir/MTLQNi
achorrit/slD
acierar/MTLQNb
aclapatge/slD
aclonar/MTLQNa
acolar/MTLQNa
acolcar/MTLQNg
acolobrèri/MTLQNd
acompesir/MTLQNi
acoquèli/MTLQNc
adobaire/slD
adocir/MTLQNi
adolesir/MTLQNi
adosilhar/MTLQNa
adversària/slD
afilandat/sF
aflocarai/MTLQNx
afloquejar/MTLQNg
afonsament/slD
aforcar/MTLQNg
afornelar/MTLQNb
agaitada/slD
agautar/MTLQNa
aglomerèri/MTLQNd
agorrudar/MTLQNa
agorrufir/MTLQNi
agrapiment/slD
agremolir/MTLQNi
agromèli/MTLQNc
aiganaissent/slD
ajocador/sl
ajornar/MTLQNa
ajudar/MTLQNSa
ajulhar/MTLQNa
ajustar/MTLQNa
alanguir/MTLQNi
albenc/slD
alegorat/slD
aliança/slD
alotjarai/MTLQNx
alucalhar/MTLQNa
alucar/MTLQNg
alumenament/slD
amaçolar/MTLQNb
amadeirar/MTLQNbr
amagriment/slD
amanar/MTLQNa
ametlièra/slD
amigar/MTLQNg
aminhardir/MTLQNi
aminhotar/MTLQNb
aminhotèri/MTLQNd
amochèli/MTLQNc
amòdi/MTLQNc
amorçatge/slD
anipar/MTLQNa
aniular/MTLQNa
anivelar/MTLQNb
annada/slD
anòncii/MTLQNc
apagelar/MTLQNb
apegar/MTLQNg
apeissonar/MTLQNa
apeitar/MTLQNa
apelaira/slD
aperteniái/MTLQNv
apiasonar/MTLQNa
apinhelèri/MTLQNd
aplogida/sl
apontèli/MTLQNc
aportar/MTLQNb
apostar/MTLQNb
apostemir/MTLQNi
aprigondar/MTLQNa
Aquitània/slD
aquitiar/MTLQNb
argal/slD
arraflar/MTLQNa
arrapinhar/MTLQNa
arrar/MTLQNa
arre/slD
arregandir/MTLQNi
arrotlèri/MTLQNd
asagador/slD
asegalar/MTLQNa
aserbar/MTLQNb
aserbèri/MTLQNd
asorar/MTLQNa
aspar/MTLQNa
assalada/slD
assèrmi/MTLQNc
astada/slD
atefiar/bh
atomizar/MTLQNa
atornar/MTLQNa
atornelar/MTLQNb
atrapar/MTLQNa
atràs/D
atropelèri/MTLQNd
ausardièr/slD
avareciós/slD
avergonhar/MTLQNa
avèspri/MTLQNc
avocat/slD
badarelar/bh
barjacaire/sF
bassor/s
belugant/SF
benestèri/d
bescomptar/ah
bevassejaire/sF
bocèli/c
bochelar/bh
bordolhaire/sF
borjon/s
braguetar/ah
brodèri/d
bufarèl/sF
caissal/s
calcigar/bh
calcigui/c
camaiar/azh
caparrut/sF
caprodelèri/d
catifolar/bh
causèli/c
cavèca/s
chabusclar/ah
chartrós/sF
chotèri/d
cobertar/bh
còfi/c
comprenèla/s
concernent/sF
congelèri/d
cooptar/bh
corcrèbi/c
cotral/sF
crensar/ah
crotèri/d
cuissièra/s
demorant/sF
desacièiri/c
desbigossar/bh
desbotinar/ah
descabdèli/c
descarrelèri/d
descòrdi/c
desencongieirar/bh
desescuferlèri/d
desfrairar/ah
desmanièri/c
despangerlar/bh
despostèri/d
dessarrar/ah
destravèrsi/c
deverdiar/bh
doble/sF
doçorós/sF
èime/slD
eissartar/MTLQNa
eissendre/MTLQNt
eisserbèri/MTLQNd
eissolèvi/MTLQNc
embabièri/MTLQNd
embanaire/slD
embeudar/MTLQNa
embrasugar/MTLQNg
embriagadura/slD
embricalhar/MTLQNa
embrimar/MTLQNa
embrugar/MTLQNg
empapòli/MTLQNc
emperlar/MTLQNb
emplegadament/slD
empreisonar/MTLQNa
emprenguèri/MTLQNw
empresar/MTLQNa
enairar/MTLQNa
encapricièri/MTLQNd
encolassar/MTLQNa
encongieirèri/MTLQNd
encongierèri/MTLQNd
encoratjanta/slD
encordar/MTLQNb
encramponar/MTLQNa
endolòmi/MTLQNc
enerbar/MTLQNb
enfantament/slD
enficelèri/MTLQNd
enfièri/MTLQNc
enfiltrar/MTLQNa
enfloroncar/MTLQNg
engarbieiréri/MTLQNd
engorgosida/slD
engràfii/MTLQNc
engraissapòrc/slD
engranjar/MTLQNg
engraunhar/MTLQNa
engròssi/MTLQNc
enquestar/MTLQNb
enraufèli/MTLQNc
enronzar/MTLQNa
ensaïnar/MTLQNa
ensarrièri/MTLQNd
ensaumadar/MTLQNa
ensedatge/slD
ensenhar/MTLQNa
entrevesi/MTLQNu
entristir/MTLQNi
entronhar/MTLQNa
entrumida/slD
envedilhar/MTLQNa
erbèri/MTLQNd
ermitatge/slD
escamat/slD
escamòti/MTLQNc
escandir/MTLQNi
escanèli/MTLQNc
escarafir/MTLQNi
escarcanelar/MTLQNb
escardassat/lD
escarnar/MTLQNa
esclapàs/slD
escófii/MTLQNc
escòrça/slD
escremèri/MTLQNd
escrincelèri/MTLQNd
escrinzelèri/MTLQNd
escrossir/MTLQNi
escurassaire/slD
escurcina/slD
esmeradura/slD
esnieirèri/MTLQNd
espantolhar/MTLQNa
esparpèli/MTLQNc
esparracar/MTLQNg
espatanar/MTLQNa
espelhadura/slD
espertizar/MTLQNa
espigal/slD
esponhi/MTLQNu
esposcar/MTLQNg
espotar/MTLQNb
espotencièri/MTLQNd
espoterlar/MTLQNb
espòutrar/MTLQNb
esquerròt/slD
estacaire/slD
estàuvii/MTLQNc
estimborlat/slD
estorrida/slD
estrambordèri/MTLQNd
estransinar/MTLQNa
estransir/MTLQNi
estrasiái/MTLQNv
estremesir/MTLQNi
etirador/s
etnologia/slD
expectorèri/MTLQNd
extravagant/slD
farlatar/ah
farnós/sF
foguinenc/sF
foira/s
foirós/SF
fosforar/bh
frescolen/SF
galhost/sF
gargòti/c
gaspinèl/s
giular/ah
goirilh/sF
grauselèri/d
illicite/slD
incèrtan/slD
incomodèri/MTLQNd
incubar/MTLQNa
inculpar/MTLQNa
indicar/MTLQNg
infiltrar/MTLQNa
infòrme/slD
interceptar/MTLQNb
intèrne/sF
islamista/slD
larguièiri/c
laurar/ah
lenhièr/sF
lepet/s
letrut/S
maçotèri/d
malfachós/sF
malganhat/S
manifacièr/SF
mastra/s
meravilhós/sF
meritant/SF
moisselar/bh
mostèl/sF
mulhar/ah
murtre/s
observable/slD
obsèrvi/MTLQNc
OMC/lD
onix/lD
organizar/MTLQNa
orlèri/MTLQNd
òrli/MTLQNc
ornhar/MTLQNa
oscultar/MTLQNa
ossèri/MTLQNd
ossilhon/slD
palasson/s
palput/sF
pepiar/bh
perdigalhat/sF
pesenada/s
pimpar/ah
poderós/sF
pòsti/c
prelevèri/d
prescriura/s
provincial/sF
racordar/bh
rauc/sF
rebavadura/s
rebondar/ah
recòfi/c
reconsolèri/d
renovar/bh
requinquilhar/ah
revòli/c
ribierèri/d
ristaire/s
robust/sF
s'acabar/A
s'acanhardir/A
s'achorrir/A
s'acodar/A
s'aconsomir/A
s'adancir/A
s'afeccionar/A
s'agarlandir/A
s'aglebir/A
s'agrolir/A
s'alastrar/A
s'alobatir/A
s'amostelir/A
s'aparassar/A
s'apinhastrar/A
s'arroflar/A
s'atacar/A
s'atrachar/A
s'embolar/A
s'encaronhar/A
s'enfarcimar/A
s'engamassir/A
s'engrafolir/A
s'entrachar/A
s'entufar/A
s'escarpoirar/A
s'esfondre/A
s'espevinhar/A
s'estresaurar/A
scienciar/bh
scientific/sF
sermar/ah
sescarèl/s
subsistent/sF
suspectèri/d
suspècti/c
tendar/ah
teron/s
torlhe/sF
torrar/bh
tudelada/s
tufar/ah
umil/slD
venician/sF
versèri/d
vícii/c
